Washington statutes.
RCW 32.50.030

Failure of savings bank to comply—Appointment of conservator—Powers and duties of conservator, immunity.

(1) After the period of supervisory direction specified by the director for compliance, if he or she determines that such savings bank has failed to comply with the lawful requirements imposed, upon due notice and hearing by the department or by consent of the savings bank, the director may appoint a conservator, who shall immediately take charge of such savings bank and all of its property, books, records, and effects. The conservator shall conduct the business of the savings bank and take such steps toward the removal of the causes and conditions which have necessitated such order, as the director may direct. During the pendency of the conservatorship the conservator shall make such reports to the director from time to time as may be required by the director, and shall be empowered to take all necessary measures to preserve, protect, and recover any assets or property of such savings bank, including claims or causes of actions belonging to or which may be asserted by such bank, and to deal with the same in his or her own name as conservator, and shall be empowered to file, prosecute, and defend any suit and suits which have been filed or which may thereafter be filed by or against such savings bank which are deemed by the conservator to be necessary to protect all of the interested parties for a property affected thereby. The director, or any newly appointed assistant, may be appointed to serve as conservator. If the director, however, is satisfied that such savings bank is not in condition to continue business in the interest of its depositors or creditors under the conservator under this section, the director may proceed with appropriate remedies provided by other provisions of this title.

(2) A person appointed as conservator by the director pursuant to this chapter is immune from criminal, civil, and administrative liability for any act done in good faith in the performance of the duties of conservator.

[ 2013 c 76 s 28; 2010 c 88 s 68.]